src/morphology/roots/pronouns.lexc
[WORD_ID=minä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=CMT]:minune     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=minä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:minusta    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=minä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:minuna     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=minä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:minun  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=minä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:minuun     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=minä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:minussa    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=minä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=INS]:minun  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=minä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:minä    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=minä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:minua  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=minä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:minuksi    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=mi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM][STYLE=MARGINAL]:mi     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=missä][POS=PROADVERB][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][CASE=INE]:missä   ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=mistä][POS=PROADVERB][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][CASE=ELA]:mistä   ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=miten][POS=PROADVERB][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][CASE=INS]:miten   ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=mitä][POS=PROADVERB][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][CASE=PAR]:mitä   ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=molemmat][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:molemmitta   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=molemmat][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:molemmilta   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=molemmat][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:molemmilla   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=molemmat][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:molemmille   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=molemmat][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=CMT]:molempine    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=molemmat][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:molemmista   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=molemmat][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:molempina    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=molemmat][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:molempien    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=molemmat][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:molempiin    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=molemmat][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:molemmissa   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=molemmat][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:molemmin     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=molemmat][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:molemmat     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=molemmat][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:molempia     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=molemmat][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:molemmiksi   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=mones][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:monensitta  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=mones][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:monensilta  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=mones][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:monensilla  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=mones][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:monensille  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=mones][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=CMT]:monensine   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=mones][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:monensista  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=mones][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:monensina   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=mones][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:monensien   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=mones][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:monensiin   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=mones][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:monensissa  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=mones][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:monensin    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=mones][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:monennet    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=mones][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:monensia    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=mones][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:monensiksi  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=mones][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:monennetta  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=mones][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:monennelta  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=mones][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:monennella  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=mones][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:monennelle  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=mones][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:monennesta  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=mones][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:monentena   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=mones][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:monennen    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=mones][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:monenteen   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=mones][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:monennessa  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=mones][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=INS]:monennen    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=mones][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:mones   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=mones][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:monetta     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=mones][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:monenneksi  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monesti][POS=PROADVERB][SUBCAT=QUANTOR]:monesti  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=moniaalla][POS=PROADVERB][SUBCAT=QUANTOR]:moniaalla   ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monias][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:moniaitta     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monias][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:moniailta     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monias][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:moniailla     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monias][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:moniaille     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monias][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=CMT]:moniaine  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monias][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:moniaista     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monias][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:moniaina  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monias][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:moniaiden     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monias][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:moniaisiin    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monias][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:moniaissa     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monias][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:moniain   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monias][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:moniaat   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monias][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:moniaita  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monias][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:moniaiksi     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monias][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:moniaatta     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monias][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:moniaalta     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monias][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:moniaalle     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monias][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:moniaasta     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monias][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:moniaana  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monias][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:moniaan   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monias][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:moniaaseen    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monias][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:moniaassa     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monias][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=INS]:moniaan   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monias][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:monias    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monias][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:moniasta  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monias][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:moniaaksi     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=moni][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:monitta  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=moni][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:monilta  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=moni][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:monilla  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=moni][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:monille  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=moni][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=CMT]:monine   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=moni][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:monista  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=moni][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:monina   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=moni][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:monien   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=moni][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:moniin   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=moni][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:monissa  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=moni][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:monin    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=moni][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:monet    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=moni][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:monia    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=moni][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:moniksi  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=moni][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:monetta  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=moni][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:monelta  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=moni][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:monella  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=moni][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:monelle  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=moni][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:monesta  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=moni][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:monena   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=moni][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:monen    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=moni][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:moneen   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=moni][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:monessa  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=moni][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=INS]:monen    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=moni][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:moni     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=moni][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:monta    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=moni][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:moneksi  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monituinen][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:monituisitta  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monituinen][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:monituisilta  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monituinen][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:monituisilla  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monituinen][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:monituisille  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monituinen][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=CMT]:monituisine   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monituinen][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:monituisista  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monituinen][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:monituisina   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monituinen][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:monituisten   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monituinen][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:monituisiin   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monituinen][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:monituisissa  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monituinen][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:monituisin    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monituinen][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:monituiset    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monituinen][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:monituisia    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monituinen][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:monituisiksi  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monituinen][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:monituisetta  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monituinen][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:monituiselta  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monituinen][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:monituisella  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monituinen][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:monituiselle  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=monituinen][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:monituisesta  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
